Mississippi, session 2026, HB1261.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 63-17-76, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 63-17-76.  (1)  Every application for the issuance and renewal of a used motor vehicle dealer's license shall be accompanied by such evidence as the * * *State Tax Commission Department of Revenue shall prescribe, documenting the completion of an education seminar conducted by the Mississippi Independent Auto Dealers Association during the twelve-month period immediately preceding the date of application.  Completion of an eight-hour licensing seminar conducted by the Mississippi Independent Auto Dealers Association shall be required for an initial license.  The Department of Revenue in coordination with the Mississippi Independent Auto Dealers Association shall determine the number of continuing education hours required for an individual renewing an application for a used motor vehicle dealer's license.  All seminars must be approved by the * * *State Tax Commission Department of Revenue. The education requirements of this section shall not apply to: * * *(a)  Used motor vehicle dealer, the primary business of which is the sale of salvage vehicles on behalf of insurers; ( * * *ba)  A manufactured home dealer; or ( * * *cb)  A franchised new car dealer licensed under the Mississippi Motor Vehicle Commission Law or any employee of such a dealer. (2)  The Mississippi Independent Auto Dealers Association shall submit to the * * *State Tax Commission Department of Revenue a complete and specific description of the seminars it conducts pursuant to this section, a description of how the seminar will benefit licensees in conducting their businesses, the number of hours involved, a description of the method which will be used to ensure attendance, and copies of any instructional materials which will be provided to attendees.  At the time approval is granted, the * * *State Tax Commission Department of Revenue shall determine how many hours of education may be received by attending the program. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.